Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 3. State Agency Office Hours.

Sec. 44.12.200.
State agency office hours.

It is the policy of the state that, to the extent practicable, state agency offices that are intended to provide services directly to the public shall schedule the hours of work of their employees so that the offices are open at the times most convenient to the individuals being served and staffed by employees working 40 hours per week. Each office shall review the preferences and needs of its clientele and shall recommend to the commissioner or other executive head of the state agency the most suitable hours of operation for that specific location. Each office shall periodically review its hours of operation.

In this section, “state agency” means a department, institution, board, commission, division, authority, public corporation, committee, or other administrative unit of the executive branch of state government, including the University of Alaska, the Alaska Railroad Corporation, and the Alaska Aerospace Corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 20 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2009, under § 2, ch. 60, SLA 2009, in this section “Alaska Aerospace Corporation” was substituted for “Alaska Aerospace Development Corporation”.